Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.192

Credit for service under prior pension system—Restoration of withdrawn contributions.

If a member of plan 1 served as a law enforcement officer or firefighter under a prior pension system and that service is not creditable to plan 1 because the member withdrew his or her contributions plus accrued interest from the prior pension system, the member's prior service as a law enforcement officer shall be credited to plan 1 if the member pays to the retirement system the amount under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement.

[ 1994 c 197 s 7; 1992 c 157 s 1.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.